Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.866

Payment of fair value—Requirements for compliance.

(1) Within thirty days of the later of the date the proposed merger becomes effective, or the payment demand is received, the limited partnership shall pay each dissenter who complied with RCW 25.10.856 the amount the limited partnership estimates to be the fair value of the partnership interest, plus accrued interest.

(2) The payment must be accompanied by:

(a) Copies of any financial statements for the most recent fiscal year maintained as required by RCW 25.10.091;

(b) An explanation of how the limited partnership estimated the fair value of the partnership interest;

(c) An explanation of how the accrued interest was calculated;

(d) A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment; and

(e) A copy of this article.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1208.]